Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4614
Substantial compliance with donor-imposed formal requirement.

A powerholder's substantial compliance with a formal requirement of appointment imposed by the donor, including a requirement that the instrument exercising the power of appointment make reference or specific reference to the power, is sufficient if:

(1) the powerholder knows of and intends to exercise the power; and

(2) the powerholder's manner of attempted exercise of the power does not impair a material purpose of the donor in imposing the requirement.

Laws 2021, LB501, § 37.